Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-2388
Authorized depositories; security; requirements.

Any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution subject to a requirement by law to secure the deposit of public money or public funds in excess of the amount insured or guaranteed by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation may give security by furnishing securities or providing a deposit guaranty bond, or any combination thereof, pursuant to the Public Funds Deposit Security Act in satisfaction of the requirement.

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 3;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 83;

Laws 2009, LB259, § 28;

Laws 2019, LB622, § 3.